Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/ast_affix.dat
# =======================================================================================
#                         Correutor normativu d'ortografía asturiana
#                                      Ficheru d'afixos
# =======================================================================================
# Copyright (C) 2010 Softastur <alministradores@softastur.org>, <esbardu@softastur.org>
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License
# as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2
# of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place - Suite 330, Boston, MA
# 02111-1307, USA.
# =======================================================================================
# Fontes: Diccionariu de l'Academia de la Llingua Asturiana (2000), 1ª Ed.
#         Normes ortográfiques de l'Academia de la Llingua Asturiana (2005), 6ª Ed.
#         Gramática de la Llingua Asturiana (2001), 3ª Ed.
# =======================================================================================

  # trY  
TRY easirtocnñlumdpgvfbqjwxyzháéíóúüḥḷ-'EASIRTOCNÑLUMDPGVFBQJWXYZHÁÉÍÓÚÜḤḶ

# Regles
#     A  Apostrofaciones al entamu de pallabra (provisional)
#     B  Apostrofaciones a lo cabero de pallabra (provisional)
#     C  (contraiciones)
#     D  Pronomes personales enclíticos en verbos (de momentu solo infinitivos)
#     E  Pallabres variables namái en númberu (regla xeneral)
#     e  Pallabres variables namái en númberu (regles especiales)
#     F  Pallabres variables en xéneru y númberu
#     f  Pallabres variables en xéneru y númberu que nun almiten neutru (xeneralmente profesiones)
#     G  Verbos regulares y con variantes ortográfiques menores
#     H  Verbos irregulares
#     I  
#     J  
#     K  
#     L  
#     M  
#     N  
#     O  
#     P  
#     Q  
#     R  
#     S  
#     T  
#     U  
#     V  
#     W  
#     Y  
#     Z  

# Apostrofaciones al entamu de pallabra (provisional)
PFX A Y 9
PFX A   0      l'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # l'arca, l'historial
PFX A   0      n'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # n'arca, n'historial
PFX A   0      d'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # d'arca, d'historial
PFX A   0      p'          a                       # p'arriba
PFX A   0      p'          ha                      # p'haza
PFX A   0      qu'         [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # qu'ellí, qu'haza
PFX A   0      m'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # m'abulta
PFX A   0      t'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # t'abulta
PFX A   0      s'          [AÁEÉIÍOÓUÚaáeéiíoóuúh] # s'abulta

# Apostrofaciones a lo cabero de pallabra (provisional)
SFX B Y 1
SFX B   0      'l          [aáeéiíoóuú]     # que'l

# (Contraiciones)

# Pronomes personales enclíticos en verbos (de momentu solo infinitivos)
SFX D Y 117
SFX D   r      me          [aei]r           # apartame, faceme, abrime
SFX D   r      te          [aei]r           # apartate, facete, abrite
SFX D   r      -y          [aei]r           # aparta-y, face-y, abri-y
SFX D   r      lu          [aei]r           # apartalu, facelu, abrilu
SFX D   r      la          [aei]r           # apartala, facela, abrila
SFX D   r      lo          [aei]r           # apartalo, facelo, abrilo
SFX D   r      los         [aei]r           # apartalos, facelos, abrilos
SFX D   r      les         [aei]r           # apartales, faceles, abriles
SFX D   r      nos         [aei]r           # apartanos, facenos, abrinos
SFX D   r      mos         [aei]r           # apartamos, facemos, abrimos
SFX D   r      vos         [aei]r           # apartavos, facevos, abrivos
SFX D   r      -yos        [aei]r           # aparta-yos, face-yos, abri-yos
SFX D   ar     ámelu       ar               # apartámelu
SFX D   ar     ámela       ar               # apartámela
SFX D   ar     ámelo       ar               # apartámelo
SFX D   ar     ámelos      ar               # apartámelos
SFX D   ar     ámeles      ar               # apartámeles
SFX D   er     émelu       er               # facémelu
SFX D   er     émela       er               # facémela
SFX D   er     émelo       er               # facémelo
SFX D   er     émelos      er               # facémelos
SFX D   er     émeles      er               # facémeles
SFX D   ir     ímelu       ir               # abrímelu
SFX D   ir     ímela       ir               # abrímela
SFX D   ir     ímelo       ir               # abrímelo
SFX D   ir     ímelos      ir               # abrímelos
SFX D   ir     ímeles      ir               # abrímeles
SFX D   ar     átelu       ar               # apartátelu
SFX D   ar     átela       ar               # apartátela
SFX D   ar     átelo       ar               # apartátelo
SFX D   ar     átelos      ar               # apartátelos
SFX D   ar     áteles      ar               # apartáteles
SFX D   er     ételu       er               # facételu
SFX D   er     étela       er               # facétela
SFX D   er     ételo       er               # facételo
SFX D   er     ételos      er               # facételos
SFX D   er     ételes      er               # facételes
SFX D   ir     ítelu       ir               # abrítelu
SFX D   ir     ítela       ir               # abrítela
SFX D   ir     ítelo       ir               # abrítelo
SFX D   ir     ítelos      ir               # abrítelos
SFX D   ir     íteles      ir               # abríteles
SFX D   ar     á-ylu       ar               # apartá-ylu
SFX D   ar     á-yla       ar               # apartá-yla
SFX D   ar     á-ylo       ar               # apartá-ylo
SFX D   ar     á-ylos      ar               # apartá-ylos
SFX D   ar     á-yles      ar               # apartá-yles
SFX D   er     é-ylu       er               # facé-ylu
SFX D   er     é-yla       er               # facé-yla
SFX D   er     é-ylo       er               # facé-ylo
SFX D   er     é-ylos      er               # facé-ylos
SFX D   er     é-yles      er               # facé-yles
SFX D   ir     í-ylu       ir               # abrí-ylu
SFX D   ir     í-yla       ir               # abrí-yla
SFX D   ir     í-ylo       ir               # abrí-ylo
SFX D   ir     í-ylos      ir               # abrí-ylos
SFX D   ir     í-yles      ir               # abrí-yles
SFX D   ar     ánoslu       ar               # apartánoslu
SFX D   ar     ánosla       ar               # apartánosla
SFX D   ar     ánoslo       ar               # apartánoslo
SFX D   ar     ánoslos      ar               # apartánoslos
SFX D   ar     ánosles      ar               # apartánosles
SFX D   er     énoslu       er               # facénoslu
SFX D   er     énosla       er               # facénosla
SFX D   er     énoslo       er               # facénoslo
SFX D   er     énoslos      er               # facénoslos
SFX D   er     énosles      er               # facénosles
SFX D   ir     ínoslu       ir               # abrínoslu
SFX D   ir     ínosla       ir               # abrínosla
SFX D   ir     ínoslo       ir               # abrínoslo
SFX D   ir     ínoslos      ir               # abrínoslos
SFX D   ir     ínosles      ir               # abrínosles
SFX D   ar     ámoslu       ar               # apartámoslu
SFX D   ar     ámosla       ar               # apartámosla
SFX D   ar     ámoslo       ar               # apartámoslo
SFX D   ar     ámoslos      ar               # apartámoslos
SFX D   ar     ámosles      ar               # apartámosles
SFX D   er     émoslu       er               # facémoslu
SFX D   er     émosla       er               # facémosla
SFX D   er     émoslo       er               # facémoslo
SFX D   er     émoslos      er               # facémoslos
SFX D   er     émosles      er               # facémosles
SFX D   ir     ímoslu       ir               # abrímoslu
SFX D   ir     ímosla       ir               # abrímosla
SFX D   ir     ímoslo       ir               # abrímoslo
SFX D   ir     ímoslos      ir               # abrímoslos
SFX D   ir     ímosles      ir               # abrímosles
SFX D   ar     ávoslu       ar               # apartávoslu
SFX D   ar     ávosla       ar               # apartávosla
SFX D   ar     ávoslo       ar               # apartávoslo
SFX D   ar     ávoslos      ar               # apartávoslos
SFX D   ar     ávosles      ar               # apartávosles
SFX D   er     évoslu       er               # facévoslu
SFX D   er     évosla       er               # facévosla
SFX D   er     évoslo       er               # facévoslo
SFX D   er     évoslos      er               # facévoslos
SFX D   er     évosles      er               # facévosles
SFX D   ir     ívoslu       ir               # abrívoslu
SFX D   ir     ívosla       ir               # abrívosla
SFX D   ir     ívoslo       ir               # abrívoslo
SFX D   ir     ívoslos      ir               # abrívoslos
SFX D   ir     ívosles      ir               # abrívosles
SFX D   ar     á-yoslu       ar               # apartá-yoslu
SFX D   ar     á-yosla       ar               # apartá-yosla
SFX D   ar     á-yoslo       ar               # apartá-yoslo
SFX D   ar     á-yoslos      ar               # apartá-yoslos
SFX D   ar     á-yosles      ar               # apartá-yosles
SFX D   er     é-yoslu       er               # facé-yoslu
SFX D   er     é-yosla       er               # facé-yosla
SFX D   er     é-yoslo       er               # facé-yoslo
SFX D   er     é-yoslos      er               # facé-yoslos
SFX D   er     é-yosles      er               # facé-yosles
SFX D   ir     í-yoslu       ir               # abrí-yoslu
SFX D   ir     í-yosla       ir               # abrí-yosla
SFX D   ir     í-yoslo       ir               # abrí-yoslo
SFX D   ir     í-yoslos      ir               # abrí-yoslos
SFX D   ir     í-yosles      ir               # abrí-yosles

# pallabres variables namái en númberu (regla xeneral)
SFX E Y 15
SFX E   0     s           [eioáéíóú]          # bates, hipis, pelos, tabús...
SFX E   u     os          [^áé]u              # canciu, cancios
SFX E   a     es          [^zcgu]a            # casa, cases
SFX E   0     es          [dlnrx]             # llaúdes, abaciales, cien, glaciares, paisaxes
SFX E   z     ces         z                   # cruz, cruces
SFX E   za    ces         za                  # asemeyanza, asemeyances
SFX E   ca    ques        ca                  # albarca, albarques
SFX E   ga    gues        ga                  # abeluga, abelugues
SFX E   a     es          [^g]ua              # ascua, ascues
SFX E   ua    ües         gua                 # agua, agües
SFX E   áu    aos         áu                  # llancaráu, llancaraos
SFX E   éu    eos         éu                  # carbayéu, carbayeos
SFX E   ús    uses        ús                  # microbús, microbuses
SFX E   és    eses        és                  # luxemburgués, luxemburgueses
SFX E   ós    oses        ós                  # adiós, adioses
